Alaska statutes. The Constitution of the State of Alaska
Article XIII Amendment and Revision

Section 1. Amendments.

Amendments to this constitution may be proposed by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature. The lieutenant governor shall prepare a ballot title and proposition summarizing each proposed amendment, and shall place them on the ballot for the next general election. If a majority of the votes cast on the proposition favor the amendment, it shall be adopted. Unless otherwise provided in the amendment, it becomes effective thirty days after the certification of the election returns by the lieutenant governor.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective October 10, 1970 (6th Legislature’s SJR 2(1970)), substituted “lieutenant governor” for “secretary of state” in the second and last sentences.

The amendment effective October 12, 1974 (8th Legislature’s HJR 20(1973)) substituted “general” for “statewide” near the end of the second sentence.

Editor’s notes. —

The amendment and a new section prohibiting a court from changing a proposed amendment that were proposed by 2000 Legislative Resolve 47 (HCS SJR 27 (FIN) am H) were rejected by voters.

Section 2. Convention.

The legislature may call constitutional conventions at any time.

Section 3. Call by Referendum.

If during any ten-year period a constitutional convention has not been held, the lieutenant governor shall place on the ballot for the next general election the question: “Shall there be a Constitutional Convention?” If a majority of the votes cast on the question are in the negative, the question need not be placed on the ballot until the end of the next ten-year period. If a majority of the votes cast on the question are in the affirmative, delegates to the convention shall be chosen at the next regular statewide election, unless the legislature provides for the election of the delegates at a special election. The lieutenant governor shall issue the call for the convention. Unless other provisions have been made by law, the call shall conform as nearly as possible to the act calling the Alaska Constitutional Convention of 1955, including, but not limited to, number of members, districts, election and certification of delegates, and submission and ratification of revisions and ordinances. The appropriation provisions of the call shall be self-executing and shall constitute a first claim on the state treasury.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective October 10, 1970 (6th Legislature’s SJR 2(1970)), substituted “lieutenant governor” for “secretary of state” in the first and fourth sentences.

Section 4. Powers.

Constitutional conventions shall have plenary power to amend or revise the constitution, subject only to ratification by the people. No call for a constitutional convention shall limit these powers of the convention.